Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Recreational Districts in Certain Counties and Municipalities

§ 55-9-21.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of Sections 55-9-21 through 55-9-37 is to further the interest of the general education, health and welfare of the people of the State of Mississippi now and in the future.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977-09; Laws, 1968, ch. 269, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 55-9-23.
General grant of authority.

Any Class 4 county, according to the 1967 tabulation of classification of counties by the State Tax Commission, which has two judicial districts, and any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River on the west and the State of Tennessee on the north, and traversed by Interstate 55, any county adjoining such counties, and any municipality located in any of such counties, may purchase, lease or acquire by gift, land and waters within this state, and develop and maintain thereon parks, athletic, cultural, educational and recreational complexes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977-01; Laws, 1968, ch. 269, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 361, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1994).

§ 55-9-25.
Definitions.

Any park or athletic, cultural, educational or recreational complex formed under the provisions of Sections 55-9-21 through 55-9-37, shall be termed a “project.”

The political subdivision forming such project, whether municipality or county, shall be termed “political subdivision.”

The political subdivisions which form, constitute or contribute to said project shall be termed “recreational district.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977-02; Laws, 1968, ch. 269, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 55-9-27.
Procedure for formation of recreational district.

Any such political subdivision desiring to either form alone or in conjunction with others any recreational district, or to become a part thereof, may do so by its governing board adopting a resolution declaring its intention to either form or become a part of such recreational district. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper having general circulation in the political subdivision. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed in such resolution for hearing objections thereto, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is least, of the qualified electors of the political subdivision shall file a written protest against such political subdivision forming or becoming a part of such recreational district on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election on the question shall be called and held as provided by law on bond issue questions. If no such protest be filed, then such political subdivision may either form or become a part of such recreational district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977-06; Laws, 1968, ch. 269, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 55-9-29.
General powers of recreational district.

Any recreational district under the provisions of Sections 55-9-21 through 55-9-37 may authorize any project constituted thereunder to acquire, enlarge, expand, own, operate, lease and dispose of properties to the end that such project may be able to promote the public interest and welfare in the participation in arts, education, culture, sports, athletics and recreational activity, and to acquire, develop, provide and improve public parks and lakes in this state, including all buildings, facilities and improvements incident thereto or useful in connection therewith, including but without limitation, picnic areas, campsites, trailer sites, cabins, lodges, roads and trails for hiking, bicycling, or horseback riding, nature trails, botanical gardens, zoos, museums, athletic fields, golf courses, tennis and badminton courts, bowling alleys, skeet, trap rifle and archery ranges, swimming pools, bathhouses, beaches, docks and marinas, boating facilities, areas and facilities for fishing and hunting, areas and facilities for aquatic entertainment and sports, stadiums, coliseums, arenas, grandstands, auditoriums, meeting halls, pavilions, and centers for cultural entertainment, music, drama, exhibitions, and exhibits, amphitheaters, administrative or office buildings and facilities, and improvements thereon, and facilities and improvements for the accommodation and transportation of visitors to such public parks. However, no recreational district shall be authorized to operate as a commercial enterprise any shop, store, motel or restaurant. Such recreational district shall be furthermore authorized to provide within any project health centers, hospitals, and to do and perform such acts, and engage in such activities as will promote the general education, health and welfare of the people of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977-08; Laws, 1968, ch. 269, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 55-9-31.
Appointment, bond, terms of office and compensation of members of project board of commissioners; board authority.

The project shall be in charge of a board of commissioners, not less than five (5) in number, nor more than fifteen (15), all of whom shall be adult resident citizens of the State of Mississippi, and each of whose terms shall be for a period of four (4) years, and who shall be appointed by the political subdivision or subdivisions constituting the recreational district. The board shall be in charge of all business and official affairs of such project, and shall be answerable only to the governing authorities of the political subdivision or subdivisions forming the recreational district. No member of any board of commissioners of any project shall be either interested directly or indirectly in any commercial enterprise operating thereon.

Such board shall have the authority to do and perform the following, but shall not be limited thereto: lease facilities or tracts of realty in said district for commercial enterprises, or other educational, athletic, cultural or recreational pursuits, to acquire by lease, purchase or gift additional realty for the project, to employ personnel in the operation and management of said project, and, in general, to have charge and control of all of the affairs and activities within said project. No land within said project may be leased for a period of longer than sixty (60) years.

Each member of the board shall be required by the political subdivision or subdivisions forming such recreational district to give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00).

No member of the board shall receive any salary for acting as a member thereof, but the recreational district may authorize reasonable payment for attendance at meetings of the board of commissioners, and reasonable expenses in carrying out the duties of such board, including travel and lodging.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977-04; Laws, 1968, ch. 269, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 42; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 55-9-33.
Exercise of police power within project.

The project shall be subject to the police power of the political subdivision or subdivisions forming the recreational district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977-03; Laws, 1968, ch. 269, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 55-9-35.
Issuance of bonds for projects.

The political subdivision or subdivisions constituting the recreational district shall be authorized to issue and sell revenue or full faith and credit bonds for any project formed under the provisions of Sections 55-9-21 through 55-9-37 in the same manner as they are now authorized by law to issue and sell such bonds for any other public purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977-05; Laws, 1968, ch. 269, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 55-9-37.
Funds for projects.

The political subdivision or subdivisions constituting the recreational district shall be authorized to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the acquisition, development, support or maintenance of any project formed under the provisions of Sections 55-9-21 through 55-9-37.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5977-07; Laws, 1968, ch. 269, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 43, eff from and after October 1, 1986.